Massachusetts, session 194th, S446.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1G of Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following new paragraph:-
All children in grades kindergarten through five attending public schools shall receive
one hundred minutes of supervised, safe, and unstructured free-play recess each week so that
there are at least twenty consecutive minutes of free-play recess per day. As used herein, the term
"free play" means an unstructured environment, but which is supervised by appropriate school
personnel or staff. Regulations promulgated by the department may not exclude recess from
structured learning time requirements for elementary school children and may not increase the
total number of hours required in the school year to meet the provisions of this subsection.
of 2

SECTION 2. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4A, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, the following section:-
Section 4B. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no public
elementary school shall decrease the amount of time it allots and provides to students as recess
time designed to allow students to participate in physical and social activities as a result of any
changes in standards or curriculum that the school is required to or chooses to adopt. For
purposes of this section, “elementary school” shall mean a school providing instruction to grades
K through 5, and, where so designated by a school committee prior to the commencement of a
school year, may also include a middle school or other intermediate level school providing
instruction to grades 5 through 6 or any combination thereof.
of 2